test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-70unwhtuma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - unõhtuma: # Verb (70) unõhtuma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     unõhuma+V+Inf/mA: [unõhtuma, unõhuma]
     unõhuma+V+Inf: [unõhtudaq, unõhudaq]
     unõhuma+V+Act+PrfPrc: [unõhtunuq, unõhunuq]
     unõhuma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [unõhtut, unõhut]

     unõhuma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: unõhu
     unõhuma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: unõhut
     unõhuma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: unõhus
     unõhuma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: unõhumiq
     unõhuma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: unõhutiq
     unõhuma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: unõhusõq
     unõhuma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: [unõhtu, unõhu]
     unõhuma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: unõhu
     unõhuma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: unõhut
     unõhuma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [unõhtu, unõhu]
     unõhuma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: unõhumiq
     unõhuma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: unõhutiq
     unõhuma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [unõhtuq, unõhtuvaq, unõhuq, unõhuvaq]

     unõhuma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: unõhuda
     unõhuma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: unõhudas

     unõhuma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: [unõhtuv, unõhuv]

     unõhuma+V+Jus: [unõhtuguq, unõhuguq]
